North Dakota, session 69, HB1029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 48-10-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
48-10-03. Powers and duties of the commission - Authority to accept gifts - Continuing
appropriation.
The capitol grounds planning commission shall confer with the state council on the arts with respect
to the artistic value of monuments, memorials, or works of art to be constructed on the capitol grounds
and with qualified consultants retained by it to select sites for buildings, facilities, monuments,
memorials, or works of art to be constructed on the capitol grounds. The commission shall develop and
modify long-term plans for the development of the capitol grounds. The commission shall approve or
disapprove the basic style and, exterior construction, and physical and aesthetic features of the public
interior areas of any building, facility, monument, memorial, or work of art constructed on the capitol
grounds. Except as otherwise provided by this section, the commission has exclusive authority to
accept or reject gifts of any type or class of property for exterior placement on the capitol grounds or for
the improvement of the exterior construction of any building or facility on the capitol grounds, including
landscaping and improvements to the capitol grounds. Any gifts of money accepted pursuant to this
section must be deposited in the capitol building fund and are appropriated on a continuing basis to the
commission for purposes consistent with this section. No construction or placement of an item on the
capitol grounds may be undertaken without the approval of the commission, unless the construction or
placement is authorized by the legislative assembly. If the legislative assembly by law or resolution
authorizes the construction or placement of an item on the capitol grounds, the commission shall
approve the site, basic style, and exterior construction of the item within a reasonable period of time.
The commission shall advise the director of the office of management and budget and the
legislative council on matters relating to the physical and aesthetic features of the nonpublic interior
areas of all buildings on the capitol grounds. The commission must be called in and shall meet
whenever major interior changes, including new construction, remodeling, or renovation of any kind, are
proposed or considered for the buildings or facilities on the capitol grounds. The commission must be
consulted before the purchase or installation of furniture or fixtures in public areas of the capitol and
other buildings on the capitol grounds. The commission may receive reports on new facility construction
and remodeling projects exceeding five million dollars, including owned and leased facilities from which
the state operates. The commission may not receive new facility construction and remodeling reports
on facilities operated by entities under the control of the state board of higher education or the national
guard. The commission shall perform any other duties as may be prescribed by law.

H. B. NO. 1029 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1029.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 3 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State